Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska33-124
County court; criminal cases; fee.

In criminal matters, including preliminary and juvenile hearings, the county court shall receive, for any and all services rendered up to and including the judgment or dismissal of the action and the issuance of mittimus or discharge to the jailer, a fee of twenty dollars. Of such twenty-dollar fee, the following amounts shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Nebraska Retirement Fund for Judges: (a) Six dollars through June 30, 2021, (b) beginning July 1, 2021, through June 30, 2022, eight dollars, (c) beginning July 1, 2022, through June 30, 2023, nine dollars, (d) beginning July 1, 2023, through June 30, 2024, ten dollars, (e) beginning July 1, 2024, through June 30, 2025, eleven dollars, and (f) beginning July 1, 2025, twelve dollars.

Laws 1915, c. 39, § 1, p. 110;

Laws 1917, c. 45, § 1, p. 126;

Laws 1921, c. 95, § 1, p. 359;

C.S.1922, § 2388;

Laws 1925, c. 98, § 1, p. 285;

C.S.1929, § 33-127;

Laws 1931, c. 64, § 1, p. 172;

Laws 1937, c. 86, § 1, p. 284;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 33-127;

R.S.1943, § 33-124;

Laws 1945, c. 74, § 2, p. 276;

Laws 1972, LB 1032, § 221;

Laws 1981, LB 99, § 3;

Laws 1982, LB 928, § 30;

Laws 1983, LB 617, § 7;

Laws 1989, LB 233, § 3;

Laws 2005, LB 348, § 11;

Laws 2015, LB468, § 8;

Laws 2021, LB17, § 7.

The independent act considered herein is not unconstitutional for failure to mention in the incidental provision for payment or exemption from payment of costs, nor for failing to refer to and repeal certain other statutes. State ex rel. Douglas v. Gradwohl, 194 Neb. 745, 235 N.W.2d 854 (1975).